Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-552
Class V school
district; board of education; members; election by district; procedure; qualifications.

The
board of education of a Class V school district shall consist of twelve members until the fourth Monday after the date in 2013 of the election
held pursuant to section 14-201 and shall consist of nine members thereafter.
One member shall be elected from each district pursuant to section
32-545. Each elected
member shall be a resident of the district for at least six months prior to
the election. Each candidate for election to and each member of the board
of education shall be a taxpayer in and a resident of the district of such
school district as designated pursuant to section 32-552.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 5, p. 318;

Laws 1909, c. 131, § 1, p. 476;

R.S.1913, § 7011;

Laws 1915, c. 125, § 1, p. 285;

C.S.1922, § 6642;

C.S.1929, § 79-2705;

Laws 1939, c. 106, § 1, p. 470;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-2705;

R.S.1943, § 79-2705;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 251, p. 775;

Laws 1969, c. 259, § 68, p. 1000;

Laws 1975, LB 423, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 446, § 31;

Laws 1982, LB 440, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 604;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1003;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 305;

Laws 2002, LB 935, § 17;

Laws 2013, LB125, § 6.

For qualifications of members of board of education, see section 79-543.

Vacancies, see section 79-545.